Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-806
Cost, defined.

Cost as applied to a project
or any portion thereof financed under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority
Act means all or any part of the
cost of acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, and renovation of all land, buildings, or structures
including the cost of machinery and equipment; finance charges; interest prior
to, during, and after completion of such construction for a reasonable period
as determined by the authority; reserves for principal and interest; extensions,
enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements; engineering,
financial, and legal services; plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates
of cost of revenue, administrative expenses, bond issuance costs, and expenses necessary
or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing
the project; and such other expenses as the authority determines may be necessary
or incidental to the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, and renovation of the project, the financing of
such acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, and renovation, and the placing of the project in
operation.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2907;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1706;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 6.